District of Columbia statutes.
28-3602

Finance charge.

Such a bank or savings and loan association may contract for and receive interest at the rate provided for in Chapter 33 of this subtitle, or, in lieu of such interest, a finance charge which, if expressed as an annual percentage rate, does not exceed a rate of 21% per annum on the unpaid balances of principal.

History

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 667, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4
Mar. 10, 1982, D.C. Law 4-70, § 4, 28 DCR 5236

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-3601.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3602.
1973 Ed., § 28-3602.